Hawaii statutes.
[§663-1.95 Employers' job reference
immunity.] (a) An employer that provides to a prospective employer
information or opinion about a current or former employee's job performance is
presumed to be acting in good faith and shall have a qualified immunity from
civil liability for disclosing the information and for the consequences of the
disclosure.

(b) The good faith presumption under
subsection (a) shall be rebuttable upon a showing by a preponderance of the
evidence that the information or opinion disclosed was:

(1) Knowingly false; or

(2) Knowingly misleading.

(c) Nothing in this section shall affect
rights, obligations, remedies, liabilities, or standards of proof under
chapters 89, 92F, 368, and 378. [L 1998, c 182, §1]

Revision Note

Section heading renamed pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next